Vermont, session 2025-2026, H136.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 8 V.S.A. § 4088n is added to read:
§ 4088n. COVERAGE FOR BIOMARKER TESTING
(a) As used in this section:
VT LEG #379974 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.136
2025 Page 2 of 7
(1) “Biomarker” means a characteristic that is objectively measured and
evaluated as an indicator of normal biological processes, pathogenic processes,
or pharmacologic responses to a specific therapeutic intervention, including
known gene-drug interactions for medications being considered for use or
already being administered. Biomarkers include gene mutations,
characteristics of genes, and protein expression.
(2) “Biomarker testing” means the analysis of a patient’s tissue, blood,
or other biospecimen for the presence of a biomarker. Biomarker testing
includes single-analyte tests, multiplex panel tests, protein expression analysis,
and whole exome, whole genome, and whole transcriptome sequencing.
(3) “Consensus statements” means statements developed by an
independent, multidisciplinary panel of experts utilizing a transparent
methodology and reporting structure and with a conflict of interest policy.
These statements are aimed at specific clinical circumstances and the
statements are based on the best available evidence for the purpose of
optimizing the outcomes of clinical care.
(4) “Health insurance plan” means any health insurance policy or health
benefit plan offered by a health insurer, as defined in 18 V.S.A. § 9402. The
term does not include policies or plans providing coverage for a specified
disease or other limited benefit coverage.
VT LEG #379974 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.136
2025 Page 3 of 7
(5) “Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines” means evidence-
based clinical practice guidelines developed by independent organizations or
medical professional societies utilizing a transparent methodology and
reporting structure and with a conflict of interest policy. Clinical practice
guidelines establish standards of care informed by a systematic review of
evidence and an assessment of the benefits and risks of alternative care options
and include recommendations intended to optimize patient care.
(b) A health insurance plan shall provide coverage for the services of
biomarker testing for the purposes of diagnosis, treatment, appropriate
management, and ongoing monitoring of a patient’s disease or condition when
the test is supported by medical and scientific evidence, including:
(1) labeled indications for a test approved or cleared by the U.S. Food
and Drug Administration (FDA);
(2) indicated tests for an FDA-approved drug;
(3) warnings and precautions on FDA-approved drug labels;
(4) Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services national coverage
determinations or Medicare Administrative Contractor local coverage
determinations; or
(5) nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines and consensus
statements.
VT LEG #379974 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.136
2025 Page 4 of 7
(c) The coverage required in subsection (b) of this section shall be provided
in a manner that limits disruptions in care, including the need for multiple
biopsies or biospecimen samples.
Sec. 2. 33 V.S.A. § 1901n is added to read:
§ 1901n. MEDICAID COVERAGE FOR BIOMARKER TESTING
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Biomarker” means a characteristic that is objectively measured and
evaluated as an indicator of normal biological processes, pathogenic processes,
or pharmacologic responses to a specific therapeutic intervention, including
known gene-drug interactions for medications being considered for use or
already being administered. Biomarkers include gene mutations,
characteristics of genes, and protein expression.
(2) “Biomarker testing” means the analysis of a patient’s tissue, blood,
or other biospecimen for the presence of a biomarker. Biomarker testing
includes single-analyte tests, multiplex panel tests, protein expression analysis,
and whole exome, whole genome, and whole transcriptome sequencing.
(3) “Consensus statements” means statements developed by an
independent, multidisciplinary panel of experts utilizing a transparent
methodology and reporting structure and with a conflict of interest policy.
These statements are aimed at specific clinical circumstances and the
VT LEG #379974 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.136
2025 Page 5 of 7
statements are based on the best available evidence for the purpose of
optimizing the outcomes of clinical care.
(4) “Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines” means evidence-
based clinical practice guidelines developed by independent organizations or
medical professional societies utilizing a transparent methodology and
reporting structure and with a conflict of interest policy. Clinical practice
guidelines establish standards of care informed by a systematic review of
evidence and an assessment of the benefits and risks of alternative care options
and include recommendations intended to optimize patient care.
(b) The Agency of Human Services shall provide Medicaid coverage for
the services of biomarker testing for the purposes of diagnosis, treatment,
appropriate management, and ongoing monitoring of a patient’s disease or
condition when the test is supported by medical and scientific evidence,
including:
(1) labeled indications for a test approved or cleared by the U.S. Food
and Drug Administration (FDA);
(2) indicated tests for an FDA-approved drug;
(3) warnings and precautions on FDA-approved drug labels;
(4) Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services national coverage
determinations or Medicare Administrative Contractor local coverage
determinations; or
VT LEG #379974 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.136
2025 Page 6 of 7
(5) nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines and consensus
statements.
(c) The Agency of Human Services shall ensure that the Medicaid coverage
required in subsection (b) of this section is provided in a manner that limits
disruptions in care, including the need for multiple biopsies or biospecimen
samples.
Sec. 3. MEDICAID STATE PLAN AMENDMENT
The Agency of Human Services shall request approval from the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services to amend Vermont’s Medicaid state plan if
necessary to provide coverage for biomarker testing as set forth in Sec. 2 of
this act.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) Sec. 1 (8 V.S.A. § 4088n) shall take effect on January 1, 2026 and shall
apply to all health insurance plans issued on and after January 1, 2026 on such
date as a health insurer offers, issues, or renews the health insurance plan, but
in no event later than January 1, 2027.
(b) Sec. 2 (33 V.S.A. § 1901n) shall take effect on the later of January 1,
2026 or upon approval by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of
the amendment to Vermont’s Medicaid state plan as directed in Sec. 3, if an
amendment is necessary.
VT LEG #379974 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.136
2025 Page 7 of 7
(c) Sec. 3 (Medicaid state plan amendment) and this section shall take
effect on passage.
VT LEG #379974 v.1